Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.64
Repair or replacement parts for
agricultural machinery and equipment used in commercial agriculture; exemption.

Sales and use
taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or
rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of repair
or replacement parts for agricultural machinery and equipment used in commercial
agriculture.

Laws 2014, LB96, § 3.